Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1448
Act; applicability.

The Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act applies to rental agreements entered into or extended or renewed after July 1, 1975.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 49;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 20.